Massachusetts, session 194th, S513.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 28 of chapter 53 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by striking out, in line 8, the word, "September", and inserting in place
thereof the following word:- "May".
of 1